California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
its value. The court may appoint one or more disinterested persons to appraise property or an interest in property for the purpose of estimating its value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

995.960.

(a) Upon the hearing, the court shall make an order determining the sufficiency or insufficiency of the bond.

(b) If the court determines that the bond is insufficient:

(1) The court shall specify in what respect the bond is insufficient and shall order that a bond with sufficient sureties and in a sufficient amount be given within five days. If a sufficient bond is not given within the time required by the court order, all rights obtained by giving the bond immediately cease and the court shall upon
ex parte motion so order.

(2) If a bond is in effect, the bond remains in effect until a bond with sufficient sureties and in a sufficient amount is given in its place, or the time in which to give the bond has expired, whichever first occurs. If the time in which to give a sufficient bond expires, the original bond remains in full force and effect for all liabilities incurred before, and for acts, omissions, or causes existing or which arose before, expiration.

(c) If the court determines that a bond is sufficient, no future objection to the bond may be made except upon a showing of changed circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Insufficient and Excessive Bonds [996.010. - 996.030.]

996.010.

(a) If a bond is given in an action or proceeding, the court may determine that the bond is or has from any cause become insufficient because the sureties are insufficient or because the amount of the bond is insufficient.

(b) The court determination shall be upon motion supported by affidavit or upon the court’s own motion. The motion shall be deemed to be an objection to the bond. The motion shall be heard and notice of motion shall be given in the same manner as an objection to the bond.

(c) Upon
the determination the court shall order that a sufficient new, additional, or supplemental bond be given within a reasonable time not less than five days. The court order is subject to any limitations in the statute providing for the bond.

(d) If a sufficient bond is not given within the time required by the court order, all rights obtained by giving the original bond immediately cease and the court shall upon ex parte motion so order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.020.

(a) If a bond is given other than in an action or proceeding and it is shown by affidavit of a credible witness or it otherwise comes to the attention of the officer that the bond is or has from any cause become insufficient because the sureties are insufficient or because the amount of the bond is insufficient, the officer may serve an order on the principal to appear and show cause why the officer should not make a determination that the bond is insufficient. The order shall name a day not less than three or more than 10 days after service.

(b) If the principal
fails to appear or show good cause on the day named why a determination that the bond is insufficient should not be made, the officer may determine that the bond is insufficient and order a sufficient new, additional, or supplemental bond to be given.

(c) If a sufficient bond is not given within 10 days after the order, the officer shall make an order vacating the rights obtained by giving the original bond, including declaring vacant any office and suspending or revoking any license or certificate for which the bond was given. Any office vacated, license suspended or revoked, or any other rights lost, for failure to give a new, additional, or supplemental bond, shall not be reinstated until a new, additional, or supplemental bond is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.030.

(a) The court if a bond is given or ordered in an action or proceeding, or the officer if a bond is given or ordered other than in an action or proceeding, may determine that the amount of the bond is excessive and order the amount reduced to an amount that in the discretion of the court or officer appears proper under the circumstances. The order is subject to any limitations in the statute providing for the bond.

(b) The determination shall be made upon motion or affidavit of the principal in the same manner as a motion or affidavit for a determination under
this article that a bond is insufficient. The notice of motion or the order to show cause made pursuant to affidavit shall be served on the beneficiary. The determination shall be made in the same manner and pursuant to the same procedures as a determination under this article that the bond is insufficient.

(c) The principal may give a new bond for the reduced amount. The sureties may be the same sureties as on the original bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Release or Substitution of Sureties on Bond Given in Action or Proceeding [996.110. - 996.150.]

996.110.

(a) A surety on a bond given in an action or proceeding may at any time apply to the court for an order that the surety be released from liability on the bond.

(b) The principal on a bond may, if a surety applies for release from liability on a bond, apply to the court for an order that another surety be substituted for the original surety.

(c) The applicant shall serve on the principal or surety (other than the applicant) and on the beneficiary a copy of the application and a notice of hearing on the
application. Service shall be made not less than 15 days before the date set for hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.120.

Upon the hearing of the application, the court shall determine whether injury to the beneficiary would result from substitution or release of the surety. If the court determines that release would not reduce the amount of the bond or the number of sureties below the minimum required by the statute providing for the bond, substitution of a sufficient surety is not necessary and the court shall order the release of the surety. If the court determines that no injury would result from substitution of the surety, the court shall order the substitution of a sufficient surety within such time as appears reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.130.

(a) If a substitute surety is given, the substitute surety is subject to all the provisions of this chapter, including but not limited to the provisions governing insufficient and excessive bonds.

(b) Upon the substitution of a sufficient surety, the court shall order the release of the original surety from liability on the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.140.

If the principal does not give a sufficient substitute surety within the time ordered by the court or such longer time as the surety consents to, all rights obtained by giving the original bond immediately cease and the court shall upon ex parte motion so order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.150.

If a surety is ordered released from liability on a bond:

(a) The bond remains in full force and effect for all liabilities incurred before, and for acts, omissions, or causes existing or which arose before, the release. Legal proceedings may be had therefor in all respects as though there had been no release.

(b) The surety is not liable for any act, default, or misconduct of the principal or other breach of the condition of the bond that occurs after, or for any liabilities on the bond that arise after, the release.

(c) The release does not affect the bond as to the remaining sureties, or alter or change their liability in any respect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. New, Additional, and Supplemental Bonds [996.210. - 996.250.]

996.210.

(a) The principal shall give a new, additional, or supplemental bond if the court or officer orders that a new, additional, or supplemental bond be given.

(b) The principal may give a new bond if a surety withdraws from or cancels the original bond or to obtain the release of sureties from liability on the original bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.220.

(a) A new, additional, or supplemental bond shall be in the same form and have the same obligation as the original bond and shall be in all other respects the same as the original bond, and shall be in such amount as is necessary for the purpose for which the new, additional, or supplemental bond is given. 

(b) A supplemental bond shall, in addition to any other requirements, recite the names of the remaining original sureties, the name of the new surety, and the amount for which the new surety is liable. The supplemental bond shall be for the amount for which the
original surety was liable on the original bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.230.

A new, additional, or supplemental bond is subject to all the provisions applicable to the original bond and to the provisions of this chapter, including but not limited to the provisions governing giving and objecting to a bond and liabilities and enforcement procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.240.

If a new bond is given in place of the original bond:

(a) The original bond remains in full force and effect for all liabilities incurred before, and for acts, omissions, or causes existing or which arose before, the new bond became effective.

(b) The sureties on the original bond are not liable for any act, default, or misconduct of the principal or other breach of the condition of the bond that occurs after or for any liabilities on the bond that arise after, the new bond becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.250.

(a) An additional or supplemental bond does not discharge or affect the original bond. The original bond remains in full force and effect as if the additional or supplemental bond had not been given.

(b) After an additional or supplemental bond is given, the principal and sureties are liable upon either or both bonds for injury caused by breach of any condition of the bonds. Subject to subdivision (c), the beneficiary may enforce the liability on either bond, or may enforce the liability separately on both bonds and recover separate judgments of liability on
both.

(c) If the beneficiary recovers separate judgments of liability on both bonds for the same cause of action, the beneficiary may enforce both judgments. The beneficiary may collect, by execution or otherwise, the costs of both proceedings to enforce the liability and the amount actually awarded to the beneficiary on the same cause of action in only one of the proceedings, and no double recovery shall be allowed.

(d) If the sureties on either bond have been compelled to pay any sum of money on account of the principal, they are entitled to recover from the sureties on the remaining bond a distributive part of the sum paid, in the proportion the amounts of the bonds bear one to the other and to the sums paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Cancellation of Bond or Withdrawal of Sureties [996.310. - 996.360.]

996.310.

This article governs cancellation of or withdrawal of a surety from a bond given other than in an action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.320.

A surety may cancel or withdraw from a bond by giving a notice of cancellation or withdrawal to the officer to whom the bond was given in the same manner the bond was given, notwithstanding Section 995.030. The surety shall at the same time mail or deliver a copy of the notice of cancellation or withdrawal to the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.330.

Cancellation or withdrawal of a surety is effective at the earliest of the following times:

(a) Thirty days after notice of cancellation or withdrawal is given.

(b) If a new surety is substituted for the original surety, the date the substitution becomes effective.

(c) If a new bond is given, the date the new bond becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.340.

(a) If the principal does not give a new bond within 30 days after notice of cancellation or withdrawal is given, all rights obtained by giving the original bond immediately cease, any office for which the bond is given is vacant, any commission for which the bond is given is revoked, and any license or registration for which the bond is given is suspended.

(b) A person whose license or registration is suspended shall not operate or carry on business pursuant to the license or registration during the period of suspension. A license or
registration that is suspended may be revived only by the giving of a new bond during the license or registration period in which the cancellation or withdrawal occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 19.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

996.350.

If the withdrawal of a surety does not reduce the amount of the bond or the number of sureties below the minimum required by the statute providing for the bond, no new bond is required or necessary to maintain the original bond in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.360.

If a surety cancels or withdraws from a bond:

(a) The bond remains in full force and effect for all liabilities incurred before, and for acts, omissions, or causes existing or which arose before, the cancellation or withdrawal. Legal proceedings may be had therefor in all respects as though there had been no cancellation or withdrawal.

(b) The surety is not liable for any act, default, or misconduct of the principal or other breach of the condition of the bond that occurs after, or for any liabilities on the bond that arise
after, the cancellation or withdrawal.

(c) The cancellation or withdrawal does not affect the bond as to the remaining sureties, or alter or change their liability in any respect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Liability of Principal and Sureties [996.410. - 996.495.]

996.410.

(a) The beneficiary may enforce the liability on a bond against both the principal and sureties.

(b) If the beneficiary is a class of persons, any person in the class may enforce the liability on a bond in the person’s own name, without assignment of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.420.

(a) A surety on a bond given in an action or proceeding submits itself to the jurisdiction of the court in all matters affecting its liability on the bond.

(b) This section does not apply to a bond of a public officer or fiduciary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.430.

(a) The liability on a bond may be enforced by civil action. Both the principal and the sureties shall be joined as parties to the action.

(b) If the bond was given in an action or proceeding, the action shall be commenced in the court in which the action or proceeding was pending. If the bond was given other than in an action or proceeding, the action shall be commenced in any court of competent jurisdiction, and the amount of damage claimed in the action, not the
amount of the bond, determines the jurisdictional classification of the case.

(c) A cause of action on a bond may be transferred and assigned as other causes of action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 105.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

996.440.

(a) If a bond is given in an action or proceeding, the liability on the bond may be enforced on motion made in the court without the necessity of an independent action.

(b) The motion shall not be made until after entry of the final judgment in the action or proceeding in which the bond is given and the time for appeal has expired or, if an appeal is taken, until the appeal is finally determined. The motion shall not be made or notice of motion served more than one year after the later of the preceding dates.

(c) Notice of motion shall be served on the principal and sureties at least 30 days before the time set for hearing of the motion. The notice shall state the amount of the claim and shall be supported by affidavits setting forth the facts on which the claim is based. The notice and affidavits shall be served in accordance with any procedure authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010).

(d) Judgment shall be entered against the principal and sureties in accordance with the motion unless the principal or sureties serve and file affidavits in opposition to the motion showing such facts as may be deemed by the judge hearing the motion sufficient to present a triable issue of fact. If such a showing is made, the issues to be tried shall be specified by the court. Trial shall be by the court and shall be set for the earliest date convenient to the court, allowing sufficient time for
such discovery proceedings as may be requested.

(e) The principal and sureties shall not obtain a stay of the proceedings pending determination of any conflicting claims among beneficiaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.450.

No provision in a bond is valid that attempts by contract to shorten the period prescribed by Section 337 or other statute for the commencement of an action on the bond or the period prescribed by Section 996.440 for a motion to enforce a bond. This section does not apply if the principal, beneficiary, and surety accept a provision for a shorter period in a bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.460.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2845 of the Civil Code, a judgment of liability on a bond shall be in favor of the beneficiary and against the principal and sureties and shall obligate each of them jointly and severally.

(b) The judgment shall be in an amount determined by the court.

(c) A judgment that does not exhaust the full amount of the bond decreases the amount of the bond but does not discharge the bond. The liability on the bond may be enforced thereafter from time to time until the amount of the
bond is exhausted.

(d) The judgment may be enforced by the beneficiary directly against the sureties. Nothing in this section affects any right of subrogation of a surety against the principal or any right of a surety to compel the principal to satisfy the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.470.

(a) Notwithstanding any other statute other than Section 996.480, the aggregate liability of a surety to all persons for all breaches of the condition of a bond is limited to the amount of the bond. Except as otherwise provided by statute, the liability of the principal is not limited to the amount of the bond.

(b) If a bond is given in an amount greater than the amount required by statute or by order of the court or officer pursuant to statute, the liability of the
surety on the bond is limited to the amount required by statute or by order of the court or officer, unless the amount of the bond has been increased voluntarily or by agreement of the parties to satisfy an objection to the bond made in an action or proceeding.

(c) The liability of a surety is limited to the amount stipulated in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The bond contains a stipulation pursuant to Section 995.520 that the liability of a personal surety is limited to the worth of the surety.

(2) The bond contains a stipulation that the liability of a surety is an amount less than the amount of the bond pursuant to a statute that provides that the liability of sureties in the aggregate need not exceed the amount of the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

996.475.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the liability of a surety pursuant to any other statute. This section is declaratory of, and not a change in, existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 33.3.)
-------------------------------------------

996.480.

(a) If the nature and extent of the liability of the principal is established by final judgment of a court and the time for appeal has expired or, if an appeal is taken, the appeal is finally determined and the judgment is affirmed:

(1) A surety may make payment on a bond without awaiting enforcement of the bond. The amount of the bond is reduced to the extent of any payment made by the surety in good faith.

(2) If the beneficiary makes a claim for payment on a bond given in an action or proceeding
after the liability of the principal is so established and the surety fails to make payment, the surety is liable for costs incurred in obtaining a judgment against the surety, including a reasonable attorney’s fee, and interest on the judgment from the date of the claim, notwithstanding Section 996.470. 

(b) Partial payment of a claim by a surety shall not be considered satisfaction of the claim and the beneficiary may enforce the liability on the bond. If a right is affected or a license is suspended or revoked until payment of a claim, the right continues to be affected and the license continues to be suspended or revoked until the claim is satisfied in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.490.

(a) Payment by a surety of the amount of a bond constitutes a full discharge of all the liability of the surety on the bond.

(b) Each surety is liable to contribution to cosureties who have made payment in proportion to the amount for which each surety is liable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.495.

A judgment of liability on a bond may be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as other money judgments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Enforcement Lien [996.510. - 996.560.]

996.510.

This article applies to proceedings for the benefit of the state to enforce the liability on a bond executed to, in favor of, or payable to the state or the people of the state, including but not limited to an official bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.520.

The person enforcing the liability may file with the court in the proceedings an affidavit stating the following:

(a) The bond was executed by the defendant or one or more of the defendants (designating whom).

(b) The bond is one to which this article applies.

(c) The defendant or defendants have real property or an interest in real property (designating the county or counties in which the real property is situated).

(d) The liability is being enforced for the benefit of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.530.

The clerk receiving the affidavit shall certify to the recorder of the county in which the real property is situated all of the following:

(a) The names of the parties.

(b) The court in which the proceedings are pending.

(c) The amount claimed.

(d) The date of commencement of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.540.

(a) Upon receiving the certificate the county recorder shall endorse upon it the time of its receipt.

(b) The certificate shall be filed and recorded in the same manner as notice of the pendency of an action affecting real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.550.

(a) Any judgment recovered is a lien upon all real property belonging to the defendant situated in any county in which the certificate is filed, from the filing of the certificate.

(b) The lien is for the amount for which the owner of the real property is liable upon the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

996.560.

If an agreement to sell real property affected by the lien created by the filing of a certificate was made before the filing of the certificate and the purchase price under the agreement was not due until after the filing of the certificate, and the purchaser is otherwise entitled to specific performance of the agreement:

(a) The court in an action to compel specific performance of the agreement shall order the purchaser to pay the purchase price, or so much of the purchase price as may be due, to the State Treasurer, and to take the State Treasurer’s receipt for payment.

(b) Upon payment, the purchaser is entitled to enforcement of specific performance of the agreement. The purchaser takes the real property free from the lien created by the filing of the certificate.

(c) The State Treasurer shall hold the payment pending the proceedings referred to in the certificate. The payment is subject to the lien created by the filing of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Offers by a Party to Compromise [998. - 998.]

998.

(a) The costs allowed under Sections 1031 and 1032 shall be withheld or augmented as provided in this section.

(b) Not less than 10 days prior to commencement of trial or arbitration (as provided in Section 1281 or 1295) of a dispute to be resolved by arbitration, any party may serve an offer in writing upon any other party to the action to allow judgment to be taken or an award to be entered in accordance with the terms and conditions stated at that time. The written offer shall include a statement of the offer, containing the terms and conditions of the judgment or award, and a provision that allows the accepting party to indicate acceptance of the offer by signing a statement that the offer
 is accepted. Any acceptance of the offer, whether made on the document containing the offer or on a separate document of acceptance, shall be in writing and shall be signed by counsel for the accepting party or, if not represented by counsel, by the accepting party.

(1) If the offer is accepted, the offer with proof of acceptance shall be filed and the clerk or the judge shall enter judgment accordingly. In the case of an arbitration, the offer with proof of acceptance shall be filed with the arbitrator or arbitrators who shall promptly render an award accordingly.

(2) If the offer is not accepted prior to trial or arbitration or within 30 days after it is made, whichever occurs first, it shall be deemed withdrawn, and cannot be given in evidence upon the trial or arbitration.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a trial or arbitration shall be deemed to be actually commenced at the beginning of the opening statement of the plaintiff or counsel, or, if there is no opening statement, at the time of the administering of the oath or affirmation to the first witness, or the introduction of any evidence.

(c) (1) If an offer made by a defendant is not accepted and the plaintiff fails to obtain a more favorable judgment or award, the plaintiff shall not recover their postoffer costs and shall pay the defendant’s costs from the time of the offer. In addition, in any action or proceeding other than an eminent domain action, the court or arbitrator, in its discretion, may require the plaintiff to pay a reasonable sum to cover postoffer costs of the
 services of expert witnesses, who are not regular employees of any party, actually incurred and reasonably necessary in either, or both, preparation for trial or arbitration, or during trial or arbitration, of the case by the defendant.

(2) (A) In determining whether the plaintiff obtains a more favorable judgment, the court or arbitrator shall exclude the postoffer costs.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting subparagraph (A) to supersede the holding in Encinitas Plaza Real v. Knight, 209 Cal.App.3d 996, that attorney’s fees awarded to the prevailing party were not costs for purposes of this section but were part of the judgment.

(d) If an offer made by a plaintiff is not
 accepted and the defendant fails to obtain a more favorable judgment or award in any action or proceeding other than an eminent domain action, the court or arbitrator, in its discretion, may require the defendant to pay a reasonable sum to cover postoffer costs of the services of expert witnesses, who are not regular employees of any party, actually incurred and reasonably necessary in either, or both, preparation for trial or arbitration, or during trial or arbitration, of the case by the plaintiff, in addition to plaintiff’s costs.

(e) If an offer made by a defendant is not accepted and the
 plaintiff fails to obtain a more favorable judgment or award, the costs under this section, from the time of the offer, shall be deducted from any damages awarded in favor of the plaintiff. If the costs awarded under this section exceed the amount of the damages awarded to the plaintiff the net amount shall be awarded to the defendant and judgment or award shall be entered accordingly.

(f) Police officers shall be deemed to be expert witnesses for the purposes of this section. For purposes of this section, “plaintiff” includes a cross-complainant and “defendant” includes a cross-defendant. Any judgment or award entered pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be a compromise settlement.

(g) This chapter does not apply to either of the following:

(1) An offer that is made by a plaintiff in an eminent domain
 action.

(2) Any enforcement action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, the Insurance Commissioner, a district attorney, or a city attorney, acting as a public prosecutor.

(h) The costs for services of expert witnesses for trial under subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not exceed those specified in Section 68092.5 of the Government Code.

(i) This section shall not apply to labor arbitrations filed pursuant to memoranda of understanding under the Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 444, Sec. 2.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. Time-Limited Demands [999. - 999.5.]

999.

(a) It is declared to be the public policy of the State of California that prompt settlements of civil actions and claims are encouraged as beneficial to claimants, policyholders, and insurers.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Extracontractual damages” means any amount of damage that exceeds the total available limit of liability insurance for all of a liability insurer’s liability insurance policies applicable to a claim for property damage, personal injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death.

(2) “Time-limited demand”
 means an offer prior to the filing of the complaint or demand for arbitration to settle any cause of action or a claim for personal injury, property damage, bodily injury, or wrongful death made by or on behalf of a claimant to a tortfeasor with a liability insurance policy for purposes of settling the claim against the tortfeasor within the insurer’s limit of liability insurance, which by its terms must be accepted within a specified period of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.1.

A time-limited demand to settle any claim shall be in writing, be labeled as a time-limited demand or reference this section, and contain material terms, which include the following:

(a) The time period within which the demand must be accepted shall be not fewer than 30 days from date of transmission of the demand, if transmission is by email, facsimile, or certified mail, or not fewer than 33 days, if transmission is by mail. 

(b) A clear and unequivocal offer to settle all claims within policy limits, including the satisfaction of all liens.

(c) An offer for a complete release from the claimant for the liability insurer’s insureds from all present and future liability for the occurrence.

(d) The date and location of the loss.

(e) The claim number, if known.

(f) A description of all known injuries sustained by the claimant.

(g) Reasonable proof, which may include, if applicable, medical records or bills, sufficient to support the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.2.

(a) A claimant shall send their time-limited demand to either of the following:

(1) The email address or physical address designated by the liability insurer for receipt of time-limited demands for purposes of this chapter, if an address has been provided by the liability insurer to the Department of Insurance and the Department of Insurance has made the address publicly available.

(2) The insurance representative assigned to handle the claim, if known.

(b) To implement this section, the Department of Insurance shall post on its internet website the email address or physical address designated by a liability
 insurer for receipt of time-limited demands for purposes of this chapter.

(c) An act by the Department of Insurance pursuant to this section is a discretionary act for purposes of Section 820.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.3.

(a) The recipients of a time-limited demand may accept the demand by providing written acceptance of the material terms outlined in Section 999.1 in their entirety.

(b) Upon receipt of a time-limited demand, an attempt to seek clarification or additional information or a request for an extension due to the need for further information or investigation, made during the time within which to accept a time-limited demand, shall not, in and of itself, be deemed a counteroffer or rejection of the
 demand.

(c) If, for any reason, an insurer does not accept a time-limited demand, the insurer shall notify the claimant, in writing, of its decision and the basis for its decision. This notification shall be sent prior to the expiration of the time-limited demand, including any extension agreed to by the parties, and shall be relevant in any lawsuit alleging extracontractual damages against the tortfeasor’s liability insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.4.

(a) In any lawsuit filed by a claimant, or by a claimant as an assignee of the tortfeasor or by the tortfeasor for the benefit of the claimant, a time-limited demand that does not substantially comply with the terms of this chapter shall not be considered to be a reasonable offer to settle the claims against the tortfeasor for an amount within the insurance policy limits for purposes of any lawsuit alleging extracontractual damages against the tortfeasor’s liability insurer.

(b) This section
 shall not apply to a claimant that is not represented by counsel.

(c) In the event a court determines that this chapter conflicts with the Civil Discovery Act, (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4), the Civil Discovery Act shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

999.5.

(a) This chapter shall only apply to causes of action and claims covered under automobile, motor vehicle, homeowner, or commercial premises liability insurance policies for property damage, personal or bodily injury, and wrongful death claims. 

(b) Except as provided in this chapter, nothing shall alter existing law, including law relating to claims, damages, and defenses, that may be asserted in litigation seeking extracontractual damages. 

(c) This chapter shall apply to time-limited demands transmitted on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Confidential Settlement Agreements [1001. - 1002.]

1001.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision within a settlement agreement that prevents or restricts the disclosure of factual information related to a claim filed in a civil action or a complaint filed in an administrative action, regarding any of the following, is prohibited:

(1) An act of sexual assault that is not governed by subdivision (a) of Section 1002.

(2) An act of sexual harassment, as defined in Section 51.9 of the Civil Code.

(3) An act of workplace harassment or discrimination, failure to prevent an act of workplace harassment or discrimination,
 or an act of retaliation against a person for reporting or opposing
 harassment or discrimination, as described in subdivisions (a), (h), (i), (j), and (k) of Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(4) An act of harassment or discrimination, or an act of retaliation against a person for reporting harassment or discrimination by the owner of a housing accommodation, as described in Section 12955 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in a civil matter described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), a court shall not enter, by stipulation or otherwise, an order that restricts the disclosure of information in a manner that conflicts with subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a provision that shields the identity
 of the claimant and all facts that could lead to the discovery of the claimant’s identity, including pleadings filed in court, may be included within a settlement agreement at the request of the claimant. This subdivision does not apply if a government agency or public official is a party to the settlement agreement.

(d) Except as authorized by subdivision (c), a provision within a settlement agreement that prevents or restricts the disclosure of factual information related to the claim described in subdivision (a) that is entered into on or after January 1, 2019, is void as a matter of law and against public policy.

(e) This section does not prohibit the entry or enforcement of a provision in any agreement that precludes the disclosure of the amount paid in settlement of a
 claim.
